Virginia statutes. Title 51.5. Persons With Disabilities.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 51.5-116.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Case management”
means a dynamic collaborative process that utilizes and builds on the strengths and resources of consumers to assist them in identifying their needs, accessing and coordinating services, and achieving their goals. The major collaborative components of case management services include advocacy, assessment, planning, facilitation, coordination, and monitoring.

“Case management system”
means a central point of contact linking a wide variety of evolving services and supports that are (i) available in a timely, coordinated manner; (ii) physically and programmatically accessible; and (iii) consumer-directed with procedural safeguards to ensure responsiveness and accountability.

“Client”
means any person receiving a service provided by the personnel or facilities of a public or private agency, whether referred to as a client, participant, patient, resident, or other term.

“Commissioner”
means the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services.

“Consumer”
means, with respect to case management services, a person with a disability or his designee, guardian, conservator, or committee.

“Department”
means the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services.

“Employment services organization”
means an organization that provides employment services to individuals with disabilities that is an approved Commission on Accreditation of Rehabilitation Facilities (CARF) accredited vendor of the Department.

“Local board”
means a local board of social services established pursuant to Article 1 (§

63.2-300

et seq.) of Chapter 3 of Title 63.2.

“Local department”
means a local department of social services established pursuant to Article 2 (§

63.2-324

et seq.) of Chapter 3 of Title 63.2.

“Local director”
means a local director of social services appointed pursuant to §

63.2-325

.

“Older person”
or

“older Virginian”

means a person who is age 60 years or older.

“Physical or sensory disability”
means a disability resulting in functional impairment or impairment of the central nervous system, which may include but is not limited to brain injury, spinal cord injury, cerebral palsy, arthritis, muscular dystrophy, multiple sclerosis, Prader-Willi syndrome, and systemic lupus erythematosus (lupus).

“Prader-Willi syndrome”
means a specific disorder that is usually caused by chromosomal change, resulting in lifelong functional and cognitive impairments and life-threatening obesity.

“Rehabilitation technology”
means the systematic application of technologies, engineering methodologies, or scientific principles to meet the needs of and address the barriers confronted by individuals with disabilities in areas that include education, rehabilitation, employment, transportation, independent living, and recreation.

History.

2012, cc. 803, 835; 2014, c. 289; 2018, cc. 243, 377.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 64 provides: “That the regulations of the Department for the Aging and the Commissioner of Rehabilitative Services shall be administered by the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services and shall remain in full force and effect until the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services promulgates regulations pursuant to the 59th enactment of this act.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 65 provides: “That effective July 1, 2013, the regulations of the Board of Social Services promulgated pursuant to §

63.2-217

, related to administration of auxiliary grants pursuant to §

63.2-800

, and adult services provided pursuant to Article 1 (§

63.2-1600

et seq.) and adult protective services provided pursuant to Article 2 (§

63.2-1603

) of Chapter 16 of Title 63.2 shall be administered by the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services and shall remain in full force and effect until the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services promulgates regulations pursuant to the 64th enactment of this act.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 66 provides: “That on or after July 1, 2012, the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall be the successor in interest to all rights, duties, or obligations created by a contract, memorandum of understanding, or other agreement of the Department for the Aging or the Department of Rehabilitative Services abolished pursuant to the 60th enactment of this act.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 67 provides: “That as of July 1, 2012, the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall be deemed successor in interest to the Department for the Aging and the Department of Rehabilitative Services to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties. All right, title, and interest in and to any tangible personal property vested in the Department for the Aging and the Department of Rehabilitative Services to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties as of the effective date of this act shall be transferred to and taken as standing in the name of the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 68 provides: “That the Governor shall appoint a Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services in accordance with the provisions of the 59th enactment of this act effective July 1, 2012.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 69 provides: “That the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services may enter into any contract, memorandum of understanding, or other agreement as may be necessary to effectuate the provisions of the 59th through 69th enactments of this act.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 70 provides: “That the Governor may transfer any employee within a state agency established, abolished, or otherwise affected by the provisions of the 59th through 68th enactments of this act, or from one such agency to another, to support the changes in organization or responsibility resulting from or required by the provisions of the 59th through 68th enactments of this act.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 71 provides: “That, notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 122 and Item 75 B 1 of Chapter 890 of the Acts of Assembly of 2011, the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall be exempt from the Payroll Services Bureau operated by the Department of Accounts and the Human Service Center operated by the Department of Human Resource Management.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 289 deleted the definition of “Functional and central nervous system disabilities” and added the definition for “Physical or sensory disability.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 243 and 377 are identical, and added the definition for “Employment services organization.”

§ 51.5-117.
Declaration of purpose; Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services created.

It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there exists in the Commonwealth a need to ensure effective programs and services, and to improve coordination of these programs and services, for citizens of the Commonwealth who, for reasons of age, disability, or other physical factors, face challenges in living independently in the community and accessing the full range of programs and services to help them achieve independence and an improved quality of life.

To achieve the objectives described in subsection A, there is hereby created the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services, with such powers and duties as are set forth in this chapter. The Department shall work to ensure effective communications access, technology, vocational, support, and protective services for these citizens within the agency and across the Commonwealth.

The Department shall be in the executive branch of state government and shall be assigned to the Secretary of Health and Human Resources.

History.

2012, cc. 803, 835.

§ 51.5-118.
Department designated as state agency for purpose of cooperation with federal government.

The Department is designated, subject to the provisions of §§

51.5-66

and

51.5-77

regarding the Department for the Blind and Vision Impaired, as the state agency for the purpose of cooperating with the federal government in carrying out the provisions and purposes of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. § 701 et seq.) and is empowered and directed to cooperate with the federal government in the administration of such act, to prescribe and provide services as may be necessary for the rehabilitation of persons with disabilities, to provide for the supervision of such services, and to disburse and administer federal funds provided for the rehabilitation of such persons.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 2.1-584, 22-327, 22-330.9; 1964, c. 276; 1978, c. 635; 1980, c. 559; 1985, c. 421, § 51.01-9, 51.5-9; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

§ 51.5-119.
Department designated as state agency for purpose of coordinating rehabilitative services.

The Department is designated as the state agency for coordinating rehabilitative services to persons with significant physical or sensory disabilities. The Department shall provide for the comprehensive assessment of the need for rehabilitative and support services of such persons, identify gaps in services, promote interagency coordination, develop models for case management, and advise the Secretary of Health and Human Resources, the Governor, and the General Assembly on programmatic and fiscal policies and the delivery of services to such persons.

History.

1989, c. 176, §

51.5-91

; 2000, c. 151; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2014, c. 289.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 343, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “A. The Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services, in cooperation with the Department of Social Services and local social services agencies, shall develop an expedited process for transitioning hospitalized persons to rehabilitation facilities when the patient may meet the criteria established by the Social Security Administration (SSA) and Medicaid for disability. As part of this expedited process, the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services (DARS) shall make Medicaid disability determinations within seven business days of the receipt of social service referrals, when the referrals include sufficient evidence that appropriately documents SSA’s definition of disability. If the referrals do not contain sufficient documentation of disability, DARS shall continue to expedite processing of these priority referrals under Medicaid regulations.

“B. The general fund appropriation in this item shall only be used for the cost of Medicaid disability determinations and for no other purpose.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 289 substituted “significant physical or sensory” for “functional and central nervous system” in the first sentence.

§ 51.5-120.
Cooperation of Department with other state departments.

The Department shall collaborate with the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services in activities related to licensing providers of (i) services under the Individual and Families Developmental Disabilities Support Waiver, (ii) services under the Brain Injury Waiver, and (iii) residential services for individuals with brain injuries as defined in §

37.2-403

. These activities include involving advocacy and consumer groups who represent persons with developmental disabilities or brain injuries in the regulatory process; training the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, local human rights committees, and the State Human Rights Committee on the unique needs and preferences of individuals with developmental disabilities or brain injuries; assisting in the development of regulatory requirements for such providers; and providing technical assistance in the regulatory process and in performing annual inspections and complaint investigations.

The Department shall collaborate with the Department of Social Services in activities related to the planning and provision of adult services pursuant to Article 4 (§

51.5-144

et seq.), adult protective services pursuant to Article 5 (§

51.5-148

), and auxiliary grants pursuant to Article 9 (§

51.5-159

et seq.).

The Department shall enter into cooperative agreements with the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, the Department of Medical Assistance Services, the Virginia Community College System, public institutions of higher education, and the Department of Education to identify the responsibilities of each public entity relating to the provision of vocational rehabilitation services as required by the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. § 701 et seq.), as amended.

History.

2012, c. 803, 835; 2016, c. 27.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 27 added subsection C.

§ 51.5-121.
Authority of Department to request and receive information from other agencies; use of information so obtained.

The Department may request and shall receive from all departments, boards, bureaus, or other agencies of the Commonwealth such records and information as is necessary for the purpose of carrying out the provisions and programs of this chapter, and the same are authorized to provide such information, provided that a written statement from the requesting party stating the reason for seeking such record is submitted and filed with the record sought. The Department may also request and receive records and information necessary for the purpose of carrying out the provisions and programs of this chapter from agencies or political subdivisions of other states. The Department may make such information available to public officials and agencies of the Commonwealth, other states, political subdivisions of the Commonwealth, and political subdivisions of other states in accordance with state and federal law when the request for information relates to administration of the various public assistance or social services programs.

History.

2012, cc. 803, 835.

§ 51.5-122.
Confidential records and information concerning adult services and adult protective services; penalty.

The records, information, and statistical registries of the Department and local departments of social services concerning adult services and adult protective services provided to or on behalf of individuals shall be confidential information, provided that the Commissioner and his agents shall have access to such records, information, and statistical registries, and that such records, information, and statistical registries may be disclosed to any person having a legitimate interest in accordance with state and federal law and regulation.It shall be unlawful for the Commissioner, his agents or employees, any person who has held any such position, or any other person to whom any confidential record or information is disclosed to disclose, directly or indirectly, such confidential record or information, except as herein provided. Every violation of this section shall constitute a Class 1 misdemeanor.

If a request for a record or information concerning applicants for and recipients of adult services provided pursuant to Article 4 (§

51.5-144

et seq.) or adult protective services provided pursuant to Article 5 (§

51.5-148

) is made to the Department or a local department by a person who does not have a legitimate interest, the Commissioner or local director shall not provide the record or information unless permitted by state or federal law or regulation.

History.

2012, cc. 803, 835.

Cross references.

As to exclusion of certain health and social services records under the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, see §

2.2-3705.5

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 51.5-123.
Community Rehabilitation Case Management System.

The Department shall develop and implement a community rehabilitation case management system. Such system shall provide for the coordination of medical, psychosocial, vocational, rehabilitative, long-term care, and family and community support services for persons with significant physical or sensory disabilities.

The Department shall facilitate the provision of such services by the Department and any other state, local, public, or private nonprofit agency, organization, or facility to such persons.

History.

1989, c. 176, § 51.5-9.2; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2014, c. 289.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 289 substituted “and implement a community rehabilitation case management system” for “and pilot a model for the initiation of a Long-Term Rehabilitative Case Management System” and “significant physical or sensory” for “functional and central nervous system” in the first paragraph.

§ 51.5-124.
Eligibility for community rehabilitation case management.

A person shall be eligible to receive community rehabilitation case management services pursuant to §

51.5-123

if the Department determines such person is disabled indefinitely and requires a combination and sequence of special interdisciplinary or generic care, treatment, or other services which are lifelong or for an extended duration and are individually planned and coordinated, or such person’s disability results in substantive functional limitations in three or more of the following areas of major life activity: (i) self-care, (ii) receptive and expressive language, (iii) learning, (iv) mobility, (v) self-direction, (vi) capacity for independent living, and (vii) economic sufficiency. Rehabilitative case management shall not be provided to any person who is eligible for Medicaid targeted case management or other publicly funded case management or Medicaid transition coordination.

History.

1989, c. 176, § 51.5-9.3; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2014, c. 289.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 289 substituted “community rehabilitation” for “long-term rehabilitative.”

§ 51.5-125.
Gifts and donations.

The Department is authorized to receive such gifts and donations, either from public or private sources, as may be offered unconditionally or under such conditions as in the judgment of the Department are proper and consistent with this title. All moneys received as gifts or donations shall be deposited in the state treasury and shall constitute a permanent special fund. Such moneys may also be used in matching federal grants. The Department shall annually submit to the Governor a full report of all gifts and donations offered and accepted, the names of the donors, the respective amounts contributed by each donor, and all disbursements of such gifts and donations.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 2.1-586, 22-239, 22-330.11; 1964, c. 276; 1970, c. 213; 1978, c. 635; 1980, c. 559; 1984, c. 734; 1985, c. 421, §§ 51.01-10, 51.5-10; 2012, c. 835; 2020, c. 728.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 728 rewrote the second sentence, which formerly read: “All moneys received as gifts or donations shall be deposited in the state treasury; shall constitute a permanent fund to be called the special fund for the rehabilitation of persons with disabilities; and shall be used by the Department to defray the expenses of rehabilitation and other services, including independent living services and advocacy services, and constructing, equipping, and operating necessary rehabilitation facilities”; and deleted “for the foregoing purposes” from the end of the third sentence.

§ 51.5-126.
Donation of equipment.

The Department shall retain title to items of nonexpendable equipment purchased by the Department for individuals or groups of individuals, in accordance with this title and the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. § 701 et seq.), while such equipment has an undepreciated monetary value. Once the equipment reaches a depreciated value of zero, the Department may donate the equipment to the individual or group of individuals then authorized to use it by the Department. The donation shall be consistent with the public purpose of the Department. The Department, in concert with the Department of Accounts, shall establish criteria for depreciation of such equipment in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and maintain depreciation records. The Department shall report a donation pursuant to this section to the Division of Purchases and Supply and to the Auditor of Public Accounts. Nothing in this section shall be construed to excuse the Department from complying with §

2.2-1124

except for equipment donated pursuant to this section.

History.

1986, c. 436, §§ 51.01-10.1, 51.5-10.1; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

§ 51.5-127.
Commonwealth Council on Aging; purpose; membership; terms.

The Commonwealth Council on Aging is established as an advisory council, within the meaning of §

2.2-2100

, in the executive branch of state government. The purpose of the Commonwealth Council on Aging shall be to promote an efficient, coordinated approach by state government to meeting the needs of older Virginians.

The Commonwealth Council on Aging shall consist of 24 members as follows: one member from each of the 11 congressional districts of the Commonwealth appointed by the Governor subject to confirmation by the General Assembly; four at-large nonlegislative citizen members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates; four at-large nonlegislative citizen members appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules; and the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services, the Director of the Department of Medical Assistance Services, the Commissioner of Social Services, the Secretary of Health and Human Resources, and the President of the Virginia Association of Area Agencies on Aging, or their designees, who shall serve as nonvoting ex officio members. Members of the Commonwealth Council on Aging shall be citizens of the Commonwealth appointed at large without regard to political affiliation but with due consideration of geographical representation. Appointees shall be selected for their ability, and all appointments shall be of such nature as to aid the work of the Commonwealth Council on Aging and to inspire the highest degree of cooperation and confidence.

After the initial staggering of terms, all appointments shall be for four-year terms.Appointments to fill vacancies shall be for the unexpired term. No person having served on the Commonwealth Council on Aging for two full consecutive terms shall be eligible for reappointment to the Commonwealth Council on Aging for two years thereafter. The remainder of any term to which a member is appointed to fill a vacancy shall not constitute a term in determining the member’s eligibility to serve.

The Commonwealth Council on Aging shall elect a chairman and a vice-chairman from among its members and shall appoint a secretary and such other officers as it deems necessary and prescribe their duties and terms of office. The Commonwealth Council on Aging may adopt bylaws to govern its operations.

Members shall receive compensation for the performance of their duties as provided in §

2.2-2813

. All members shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

. Funding for the costs of compensation and expenses of the members shall be provided by the Department.

The Department shall provide staff support to the Commonwealth Council on Aging.

History.

1998, c. 665, § 2.1-373.02; 2000, cc. 877, 896; 2001, c. 844, §

2.2-2626

; 2004, c. 1000; 2010, cc. 411, 801; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

§ 51.5-128.
Duties of the Commonwealth Council on Aging.

The Commonwealth Council on Aging shall have the following duties:

Examine the needs of older Virginians and their caregivers and ways in which state government can most effectively and efficiently assist in meeting those needs;

Advise the Governor and General Assembly on aging issues and aging policy for the Commonwealth;

Advise the Governor on any proposed regulations deemed by the Director of the Department of Planning and Budget to have a substantial and distinct impact on older Virginians and their caregivers. Such advice shall be provided in addition to other regulatory reviews required by the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.);

Advocate for and assist in developing the Commonwealth’s planning for meeting the needs of the growing number of older Virginians and their caregivers; and

Assist and advise the Department regarding strategies to improve nutritional health, alleviate hunger, and prevent malnutrition among older adults.

The Commonwealth Council on Aging may apply for and expend such grants, gifts, or bequests from any source as may become available in connection with its duties under this section, and may comply with such conditions and requirements as may be imposed in connection therewith.

The Commonwealth Council on Aging shall submit to the Governor, General Assembly, and Department by October 1 of each year an electronic report regarding the activities and recommendations of the Commonwealth Council on Aging, which shall be submitted for publication as a report document as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website and the Department’s website.

History.

1998, c. 665, § 2.1-373.02; 2000, cc. 877, 896; 2001, c. 844, § 2.2-2627; 2010, cc. 411, 801; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2017, c. 202; 2020, c. 728; 2022, c. 533.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 202 added subdivision A 6, and made related changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 728 deleted subdivision A 5, which formerly read: “Assist and advise the Department with the development and ongoing review of the Virginia Respite Care Grant Program pursuant to Article 8 (§

51.5-155

et seq.),” renumbered former subdivision A 6 as subdivision A 5, and made a related change.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 533, added subsection C.

§ 51.5-129.
Creation of State Rehabilitation Council; purpose; membership.

The State Rehabilitation Council is established as a designated state council in the executive branch of government for the purpose of providing advice to and performing other functions for the Department regarding vocational services provided pursuant to Title I and Title VI of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. § 701 et seq. and 29 U.S.C. § 795 et seq., respectively). Membership, terms, and meeting requirements shall be in accordance with federal provisions as provided in 29 U.S.C. § 725.

History.

2012, cc. 803, 835.